Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.008

Intent.

It is the intent of this chapter to protect the public health, safety, and welfare; to protect the public from being misled by incompetent, unethical, and unauthorized persons; and to assure the availability of hearing and speech services of high quality to persons in need of such services.

[ 1996 c 200 s 1.]